hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Vozila > Motorna vozila > Vozila za motosport: Trkaći automobili; Vozila za karting; Trkaći motocikli; Trkaći motocikli s prikolicom; Trkaći kamioni
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Veículos > Veículos terrestres > Veículos esportivos motorizados: Carros de corrida; Karts de corrida; Motocicletas de corrida; Sidecars de corrida; Caminhões de corrida
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Xe cộ > Xe cơ giới > Xe thể thao cơ giới: Xe đua; Đua xe điện; Mô tô đua; Xe mô-tô đua ba bánh; Xe tải đua
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛 > 機動車輛 > 動力運動車輛: 賽車; 競速卡丁車; 競速機車; 競速邊車; 競速卡車
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 > 자동차 > 모터 스포츠 차량: 경주용 자동차; 레이싱 카트; 경주용 오토바이; 레이싱 사이드카; 레이싱 트럭
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具 > 机动车 > 竞赛运动车辆: 赛车; 竞赛卡丁车; 竞赛摩托车; 竞赛边车; 竞赛卡车
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Vozila > Motorna vozila > Motorna športna vozila: Dirkalni avtomobili; Dirkalni gokarti; Dirkalna motorna kolesa; Dirkalna motorna kolesa s stranskim priklopnikom; Dirkalni tovornjaki
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonės > Motorinės transporto priemonės > Motorinės sportinės transporto priemonės: Lenktyniniai automobiliai; Lenktyniniai kartingai; Lenktyniniai motociklai; Lenktyniniai motociklai su lopšiais; Lenktyniniai sunkvežimiai
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Véhicules > Véhicules terrestres > Véhicules de sport motorisé: Voitures de course; Karts de course; Motos de course; Side-cars de course; Camions de course
pl: Pojazdy i części > Pojazdy > Pojazdy silnikowe > Pojazdy sportowe: Samochody wyścigowe; Gokarty wyścigowe; Motocykle wyścigowe; Wyścigowe motocykle z bocznym wózkiem; Ciężarówki wyścigowe
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Dopravní prostředky > Motorová vozidla > Motorová sportovní vozidla: Závodní auta; Závodní motokáry; Závodní motorky; Závodní sajkáry; Závodní kamiony
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıtlar > Motorlu Taşıtlar > Motor Sporları Araçları: Yarış Arabaları; Go Kart Yarış Araçları; Yarış Motosikletleri; Yarış Motosikleti Sepetleri; Yarış Kamyonları
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigen > Landvoertuigen > Motorsportvoertuigen: Raceauto's; Racekarts; Racemotoren; Racemotoren met zijspan; Racetrucks
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Veículos > Veículos motorizados > Veículos de desporto motorizados: Carros de corrida; Karts de corrida; Motas de corrida; Sidecars de corrida; Camiões de corrida
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Kjøretøy > Biler > Motorsportskjøretøy: Racerbiler; Racer-gokarter; Racermotorsykler; Sidevogner til racersykler; Racertrucker
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvot > Moottoriajoneuvot > Moottoriurheiluajoneuvot: Kilpa-autot; Karting-kilpa-autot; Kilpamoottoripyörät; Sivuvaunulliset moottoripyörät kilpa-ajoon; Kilpakuorma-autot
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Vehicule > Autovehicule > Vehicule pentru sporturi cu motor: Mașini de curse; Cart de curse; Motociclete de curse; Motociclete de curse cu ataș; Camioane de curse
da: Køretøjer og dele > Køretøjer > Motorkøretøjer > Motorsportskøretøjer: Racerbiler; Gokarts; Racermotorcykler; Racing-sidevogne; Racing-lastbiler
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Транспортные средства > Автотранспорт > Моторные спортивные транспортные средства: Гоночные автомобили; Гоночные карты; Гоночные мотоциклы; Коляски для гоночных мотоциклов; Гоночные грузовики
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicles > Motor Vehicles > Motor Sports Vehicles: Race Cars; Racing Karts; Racing Motorcycles; Racing Sidecars; Racing Trucks
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Vozidlá > Motorové vozidlá > Motorové športové vozidlá: Závodné autá; Závodné motokáry; Závodné motocykle; Závodné sajdkáry; Závodné nákladné autá
es: Vehículos y recambios > Vehículos > Vehículos motorizados > Vehículos deportivos de motor: Automóviles de carreras; Karts de carreras; Motos de carreras; Sidecares de carreras; Camiones de carreras
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járművek > Gépjárművek > Motorsportjárművek: Versenyautók; Versenygokartok; Versenymotorok; Versenyoldalkocsik; Versenyteherautók
it: Veicoli e parti > Veicoli > Veicoli per terraferma > Veicoli per sport motoristici: Auto da corsa; Kart da corsa; Moto da corsa; Sidecar da corsa; Camion da corsa
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物 > 自動車・バイク > モータースポーツ車両: レースカー; レーシングカート; レーシングバイク; レーシングサイドカー; レーシングトラック
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeuge > Kraftfahrzeuge > Motorsportfahrzeuge: Rennwagen; Rennkarts; Rennmotorräder; Rennbeiwagen; Renntrucks
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Превозни средства > Моторни превозни средства > Моторни спортни превозни средства: Състезателни автомобили; Състезателни картинги; Състезателни мотоциклети; Състезателни мотоциклети с кош; Състезателни камиони
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ยานพาหนะ > ยานยนต์ > ยานยนต์กีฬามอเตอร์สปอร์ต: รถแข่ง; โกคาร์ทแข่งรถ; มอเตอร์ไซค์แข่ง; แข่งรถมอเตอร์ไซค์สามล้อ; รถบรรทุกแข่ง
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordon > Motorfordon > Motorsportfordon: Racerbilar; Racingbilar; Racingmotorcyklar; Racing sidvagnar; Racing lastbilar
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Οχήματα > Μηχανοκίνητα οχήματα > Οχήματα μηχανοκίνητου αθλητισμού: Αγωνιστικά αυτοκίνητα; Αγωνιστικά αυτοκίνητα τύπου κάρτ; Αγωνιστικές μοτοσυκλέτες; Αγωνιστικά Sidecars; Αγωνιστικά φορτηγά